Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-305
Cities, villages, school districts, and counties; joint facilities; powers.

For the specific purposes set forth in section 13-304, any city, village, school district or county shall have the power to receive (1) any grant or devise of real estate, (2) any grant or gift or bequest of money or other personal property, and (3) any other donation in trust or otherwise.

Laws 1963, c. 481, § 2, p. 1550;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-821.

City may acquire real estate for park purposes by gift. Bowley v. City of Omaha, 181 Neb. 515, 149 N.W.2d 417 (1967).